Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.440

Job order procedure—Contract requirements.

(1) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job order contract is $4,000,000 per year for a maximum of three years. Any unused capacity from the previous year may be carried over for one year and added to the immediate following year's limit. The maximum annual volume including unused capacity shall not exceed the limit of two years. The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job order contract for the department of enterprise services, counties with a population of more than 1,000,000, and cities with a population of more than 400,000 is $6,000,000 per year for a maximum of three years. The maximum total dollar amounts are exclusive of Washington state sales and use tax.

(2) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of not to exceed two years, with the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for one year. All extensions or renewals must be priced as provided in the request for proposals. The extension or renewal must be mutually agreed to by the public body and the job order contractor.

(3) A public body may have no more than three job order contracts in effect at any one time, with the exception of the department of enterprise services, which may have six job order contracts in effect at any one time.

(4) At least 90 percent of work contained in a job order contract must be subcontracted to entities other than the job order contractor. The job order contractor must distribute contracts as equitably as possible among qualified and available subcontractors including certified minority and woman-owned subcontractors to the extent permitted by law as demonstrated on the subcontractor and supplier project submission, and shall limit subcontractor bonding requirements to the greatest extent possible.

(5) The job order contractor shall publish notification of intent to perform public works projects at the beginning of each contract year in a statewide publication and in a legal newspaper of general circulation in every county in which the public works projects are anticipated. The job order contractor is encouraged to post the notification of intent to perform public works projects in other areas, such as websites for business associations, the office of minority and women's business enterprises, and other locations and mediums that will further publicize subcontractor opportunities.

(6) Job order contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued.

(7) If, in the initial contract term, the public body, at no fault of the job order contractor, fails to issue the minimum amount of work orders stated in the public request for proposals, the public body shall pay the contractor an amount equal to the difference between the minimum work order amount and the actual total of the work orders issued multiplied by an appropriate percentage for overhead and profit contained in the contract award coefficient for services as specified in the request for proposals. This is the contractor's sole remedy.

(8) All job order contracts awarded under this section must be signed before July 1, 2031; however the job order contract may be extended or renewed as provided for in this section.

[ 2021 c 230 s 16; 2019 c 212 s 9; 2015 c 173 s 1; 2013 c 222 s 19; 2007 c 494 s 403.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.